Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 5. Tax-Credit Bond Financing

§ 3597.
Tax-credit bond financing; qualified school academy zones; qualified school construction bonds.

The American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Pub. L. No. 111-5, expanded existing and created new tax-credit bond programs available to public schools. Accordingly, school districts are authorized to issue bonds to finance public school building construction and rehabilitation, the purchase of equipment, the development of course materials, and teacher and personnel training, consistent with Sections 1397E and 54F of the Internal Revenue Code, pertaining to qualified school academy zones and qualified school construction bonds.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 54

, § 21, eff. June 1, 2009.